Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20262-1225
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 2-1207 and 2-1224 to 2-1229, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Commission means the State Racing and Gaming Commission;

(2) Interstate simulcast means parimutuel wagering at any licensed racetrack within the state on the results of any horserace conducted outside the state;

(3) Licensed horserace meeting includes, but is not limited to, licensed racetrack enclosures at which simulcasts or interstate simulcasts are conducted;

(4) Operator means any licensee issued a license under sections 2-1201 to 2-1223 operating a simulcast facility in accordance with sections 2-1224 to 2-1229;

(5) Receiving track means any track which displays a simulcast which originates from another track or which conducts interstate simulcasts;

(6) Sending track means any track from which a simulcast or interstate simulcast originates;

(7) Simulcast means the telecast of live audio and visual signals of any horserace conducted in the state for the purpose of parimutuel wagering;

(8) Simulcast facility means a facility within the state which is authorized to display simulcasts for parimutuel wagering purposes under sections 2-1224 to 2-1227 or to conduct interstate simulcasts under sections 2-1228 and 2-1229; and

(9) Track means the grounds within the licensed racetrack enclosure where horseraces are conducted by licensees authorized to conduct such races in accordance with sections 2-1201 to 2-1223.

Laws 1987, LB 708, § 2;

Laws 1989, LB 591, § 5;

Laws 2021, LB561, § 23;

Laws 2025, LB357, § 10.